apertium-de-nl.de.dix
    <pardef n="aufmerksam__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gr/oß__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oß</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ößer</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ößt</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="j/ung__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ung</l>
          <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ünger</l>
          <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>üngst</l>
          <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/urz__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urz</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ürzer</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ürzest</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kl/ug__adj">
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>ug</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>üger</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
       <p>
        <l>ügst</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="teu/er__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rer</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rest</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="w/arm__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arm</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärmer</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärmst</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Adverben -->

    <pardef n="/bald__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bald</l>
          <r>bald<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eher</l>
          <r>eher<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am ehesten</l>
          <r>am ehesten<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/gern__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gern</l>
          <r>gern<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lieber</l>
          <r>lieber<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am liebsten</l>
          <r>am liebsten<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="doch__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
   
    <!-- Nomen -->
    <pardef n="H/aus__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aus</l>
          <r>aus<s n="n"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>äuser</l>
          <r>aus<s n="n"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aus</l>
          <r>aus<s n="n"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>äuser</l>
          <r>aus<s n="n"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aus</l>
          <r>aus<s n="n"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ause</l>
          <r>aus<s n="n"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>äusern</l>
          <r>aus<s n="n"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aus</l>
          <r>aus<s n="n"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>äuser</l>
          <r>aus<s n="n"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Polizei__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Herbst__n">
      <e>
        <p> 
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p> 
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p> 
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p> 
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p> 
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p> 
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
         <p> 
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
         </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Ruhe__n"> <!-- noun, feminine, uncountable -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="unc"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="unc"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="unc"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="unc"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Herbst"><i>Herbst</i><par n="Herbst__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Polizei"><i>Polizei</i><par n="Polizei__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Haus"><i>H</i><par n="H/aus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Ruhe"><i>Ruhe</i><par n="Ruhe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="behilflich"><i>behilflich</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dick"><i>dick</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dünn"><i>dünn</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fähig"><i>fähig</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fleißig"><i>fleißig</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="frei"><i>frei</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="frisch"><i>frisch</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="froh"><i>froh</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fröhlich"><i>fröhlich</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="geschmackvoll"><i>geschmackvoll</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gewöhnlich"><i>gewöhnlich</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="glücklich"><i>glücklich</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="heiter"><i>heiter</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="herrlich"><i>herrlich</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="herzlich"><i>herzlich</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hübsch"><i>hübsch</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kraftvoll"><i>kraftvoll</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="klar"><i>klar</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="klein"><i>klein</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kostbar"><i>kostbar</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kräftig"><i>kräftig</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lecker"><i>lecker</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="modern"><i>modern</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="müde"><i>müde</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="neugierig"><i>neugierig</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="reich"><i>reich</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ruhig"><i>ruhig</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="schnell"><i>schnell</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="schrecklich"><i>schrecklich</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="schwierig"><i>schwierig</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="still"><i>still</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tüchtig"><i>tüchtig</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vorzüglich"><i>vorzüglich</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="wichtig"><i>wichtig</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="zufrieden"><i>zufrieden</i><par n="aufmerksam__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="groß"><i>gr</i><par n="gr/oß__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jung"><i>j</i><par n="j/ung__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kurz"><i>k</i><par n="k/urz__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="klug"><i>k</i><par n="kl/ug__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="teuer"><i>teu</i><par n="teu/er__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="warm"><i>w</i><par n="w/arm__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bald"><i/><par n="/bald__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="gern"><i/><par n="/gern__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="doch"><i>doch</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="eigentlich"><i>eigentlich</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="etwa"><i>etwa</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="gerade"><i>gerade</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="noch"><i>noch</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nur"><i>nur</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="schon"><i>schon</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="endlich"><i>endlich</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="heute"><i>heute</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="immer"><i>immer</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="morgen"><i>morgen</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="morgens"><i>morgens</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sofort"><i>sofort</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="stark"><i>stark</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="äußerst"><i>äußerst</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="besonders"><i>besonders</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="beträchtlich"><i>beträchtlich</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ziemlich"><i>ziemlich</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="wieder"><i>wieder</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="vor"><i>vor</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="gleich"><i>gleich</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="überall"><i>überall</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="vielleicht"><i>vielleicht</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nun"><i>nun</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hier"><i>hier</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nicht"><i>nicht</i><par n="doch__adv"/></e>
